New York, session 2025-2026, A7882.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 17-0805 of the environmental 2 conservation law is amended by adding a new paragraph a-1 to read as 3 follows: 4 a-1. (i) For storm water from construction activities that requires a 5 SPDES permit, the owner or operator shall provide a copy of the public 6 notice required by paragraph a of this subdivision to the county or 7 counties in which such construction activities take place, and all other 8 counties, the waters of which may be affected. 9 (ii) Each county receiving such notice shall make such notice publicly 10 available on its website in a manner prescribed by the department. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 12 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 13 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the imple- 14 mentation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made 15 and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05210-01-5